Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1723.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1302(10) of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 1302. Vehicles exempt from registration.The following types of vehicles are exempt from registration:* * *(10) Any farm vehicle used exclusively upon a farm or farms owned or operated by the owner of the vehicle, subject to the following:(i.1) Type A--Such a farm vehicle with a gross vehicle weight rating not exceeding 10,000 pounds may be driven upon highways only from sunrise to sunset and between:(A) Parts of one such farm.123456789101112131415161718 (B) Such farms located not more than [50] 100 miles apart.(C) Such farm or farms and a place of business located within a radius of [50] 100 miles from such farm or farms for the purpose of buying or selling agricultural commodities or supplies.(D) Such farm or farms and a place of business located within a radius of [50] 100 miles from such farm or farms for the purpose of repairing or servicing of the farm vehicle or the trailer or semitrailer being towed or hauled by the farm vehicle.(i.2) Type B--Such a farm vehicle with a gross vehicle weight rating of greater than 10,000 pounds and not exceeding 17,000 pounds may be driven upon highways only from sunrise to sunset and between:(A) Parts of one such farm.(B) Such farms located not more than [25] 50 miles apart.(C) Such farm or farms and a place of business located within a radius of [25] 50 miles from such farm or farms for the purpose of buying or selling agricultural commodities or supplies.(D) Such farm or farms and a place of business located within a radius of [50] 100 miles from such farm or farms for the purpose of repairing or servicing of the farm vehicle or the trailer or semitrailer being towed or hauled by the farm vehicle.(i.3) Type C--Such a farm vehicle which does qualify 20250HB1723PN2123 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 as a motor carrier vehicle and which does not display a currently valid certificate of inspection may be driven upon highways only from sunrise to sunset and between:(A) Parts of one such farm.(B) Such farms located not more than [ten] 20 miles apart.(C) Such farm or farms and a place of business located within a radius of [ten] 20 miles from such farm or farms for the purpose of buying or selling agricultural commodities or supplies.(D) Such farm or farms and a place of business located within a radius of [25] 50 miles from such farm or farms for the purpose of repairing or servicing of the farm vehicle or the trailer or semitrailer being towed or hauled by the farm vehicle.(i.4) Type D--Such a farm vehicle which does qualify as a motor carrier vehicle and displays a currently valid certificate of inspection may be driven without any restriction as to time but may only be driven on highways between:(A) Parts of one such farm.(B) Such farms located not more than [50] 100 miles apart.(C) Such farm or farms and a place of business located within a radius of [50] 100 miles from such farm or farms for the purpose of buying or selling agricultural commodities or supplies or for repairing or servicing of the farm vehicle or the trailer or semitrailer being towed or hauled by the farm 20250HB1723PN2123 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 vehicle.(iii) A biennial certificate of exemption shall be required for a farm vehicle exempt under this paragraph.(iv) The owner of the farm vehicle shall maintain such minimum levels of liability insurance coverage on the vehicle as are required to be maintained under Chapter 17 (relating to financial responsibility) by owners of registered motor vehicles. The owner shall satisfy the requirements of this subparagraph if the minimum amounts of liability insurance coverage for the farm vehicle have been provided under farm liability insurance coverage maintained generally by the owner. Coverage prescribed in Subchapter B of Chapter 17 shall not be required to be maintained or provided for the farm vehicle.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1723PN2123 - 4 - 1234567891011121314151617